Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
CHAPTER 2 Descent and Distribution

Cross references.

Payment of outstanding wages to surviving spouse or minor children upon death of employee, §

34-7-4

.

Manner of payment of workers’ compensation benefits of deceased employee, §

34-9-13

.

Escheat of estate when intestate leaves no heirs, T. 53, C. 2, A. 5.

Editor’s notes.

This chapter was effective January 1, 1998, to the extent that no vested rights of title, year’s support, succession, or inheritance are impaired, as provided by the version of Code Section 53-1-1 enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, as amended by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 1.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, effective January 1, 1998, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter, and enacted the current chapter.
The former chapter consisted of §§

53-2-1

through

53-2-1

0 (Article 1);

53-2-20

through

53-2-26

(Article 2);

53-2-40

,

53-2-40

.1, and

53-2-41

through

53-2-51

(Article 3); 53-2-70 through 53-2-77 (Article 4); and 53-2-90 through 53-2-117 (Article 5), and was based on Laws 1677, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 1129; Laws 1834, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 347; Laws 1836, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 348; Ga. L. 1851-52, p. 104, § 1; Orig. Code 1863, §§ 2215, 2362 through 2377, 2379, 2381 through 2388, 2419 through 2448, 2450, 3093 through 3095; Code 1868, §§ 2210, 2359 through 2364 through 2374, 2376 through 2384, 2415 through 2444, 2446, 3105 through 3107; Ga. L. 1869, p. 163, § 1; Code 1873, §§ 2236, 2394 through 2409, 2411 through 2419, 2446, 2451 through 2480, 2482, 3162 through 3164; Code 1882, §§ 2236, 2394 through 2409, 2411 through
2419, 2446, 2451 through 2480, 2482, 3162 through 3164; Civil Code 1895, §§ 3067, 3253 through 3277, 3314, 3319 through 3350, 3352, 4013 through 4015; Civil Code 1910, §§ 3643, 3827 through 3851, 3890, 3895 through 3926, 3928, 4610 through 4612; Code 1933, §§ 37-502 through 37-504, 113-101 through 113-109, 113-201 through 113-210, 113-301 through 113-306, 113-401 through 113-409, 113-501 through 113-504, 113-801 through 113-824; Ga. L. 1937, p. 430, § 1; Ga. L. 1952, p. 196, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 657, §§ 1-3, 10; Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 16, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1967, p. 718, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 1070, § 1; Code 1933, § 113-824, enacted by Ga. L. 1972, p. 452, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1292, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 834, § 1; Code 1981, § 53-2-40.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1984, p. 834, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1359, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 299, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 372, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1057, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note, “Not Just For Kids:
Why Georgia’s Statutory Disinheritance of Deadbeat Parents Should Extend to Intestate Adults,” see 43 Ga. L. Rev. 867 (2009).